Illinois, session 104th, SB124.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Motor Vehicle 5Insurance Fairness Act. 6    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 7adding Section 143.19.4 as follows: 8    (215 ILCS 5/143.19.4 new)9    Sec. 143.19.4. Motor vehicle insurance fairness.10    (a) Definition. As used in this Section, "proceeding" 11includes the filing of any rate, rule, or form and any 12rulemaking conducted pursuant to this Section. 13    (b) Prohibitions; refusal to insure. 14        (1) No insurer shall refuse to issue or renew a policy 15    of automobile insurance, bond, or any other insurance 16    based on the ownership or operation of a motor vehicle 17    based in whole or in part on any of the prohibited 18    underwriting and rating factors set forth in subsection 19    (c), or use those factors to determine the terms of 20    coverage or placement in a particular affiliate within an 21    insurance company group.22        (2) Classification plans, rating plans, rating tier   SB0124- 2 -LRB104 06207 BAB 16242 b1    placement factors, scoring models, rules, rates, premiums, 2    or any other method of establishing the premium to be paid 3    by an automobile insurance policyholder or covered driver, 4    and the modification thereof, based in whole or in part on 5    any of the prohibited underwriting and rating factors in 6    subsection (c) are unfairly discriminatory.7    (c) Prohibited factors. With respect to underwriting and 8rating a policy of automobile insurance, the use of the 9following factors shall be prohibited: 10        (1) sex or gender;11        (2) marital status;12        (3) race;13        (4) creed;14        (5) national origin;15        (6) religion;16        (7) age;17        (8) employment or occupation;18        (9) education level attained;19        (10) home ownership;20        (11) consumer credit information or other credit-based 21    score;22        (12) the absence of prior insurance;23        (13) the amount or provider of prior insurance 24    coverage;25        (14) any measure of a consumer's price elasticity of 26    demand;  SB0124- 3 -LRB104 06207 BAB 16242 b1        (15) the zip code, or any territorial designation 2    geographically smaller than the zip code, in which the 3    policyholder resides; and 4        (16) the level of income or wealth.5    (d) Years of driving experience. Notwithstanding item (7) 6of subsection (c), an insurer may consider the number of years 7of driving experience of an applicant for the purposes of 8underwriting and rating. 9    (e) Territory or any other geographical characteristic. 10Territory or any other geographical characteristic shall not 11be considered for the purposes of underwriting a policy of 12automobile insurance, including, but not limited to, any 13decision to sell, refuse to sell, cancel, or non-renew, and 14the terms of the policy of automobile insurance. 15Notwithstanding item (15) of subsection (c), an insurer may, 16for rating purposes, use a territorial factor that is not 17prohibited if the territorial factor does not have more than a 1825% impact on the premium that would otherwise be charged. 19    (f) Prohibited business practices. Every insurer selling a 20policy of automobile insurance in Illinois shall demonstrate 21that its marketing, underwriting, rating, claims handling, 22fraud investigations, and any algorithm or model used for 23those business practices do not disparately impact any group 24of customers based on race, color, national or ethnic origin, 25religion, sex, sexual orientation, disability, gender 26identity, or gender expression.   SB0124- 4 -LRB104 06207 BAB 16242 b1    (g) Prior approval of rates. 2        (1) No rate shall be approved or remain in effect that 3    is excessive, inadequate, unfairly discriminatory, or 4    otherwise in violation of this Section. In considering 5    whether a rate is excessive, inadequate, or unfairly 6    discriminatory, no consideration shall be given to the 7    degree of competition, and the Director shall consider 8    whether the rate mathematically reflects the insurance 9    company's investment income.10        (2) Every insurer that desires to change any rate 11    shall file a complete rate application with the Director. 12    A complete rate application shall include all data 13    necessary to justify the proposed rate and such other 14    information as the Director may require. The applicant 15    shall have the burden of proving that the requested rate 16    change is justified and meets the requirements of this 17    Section.18        (3) The Director shall notify the public of any 19    application by an insurer for a rate change. The 20    application shall be deemed approved 60 days after public 21    notice unless:22            (A) the Director disapproves the application;23            (B) a consumer or the consumer's representative 24        requests a hearing within 45 days after the public 25        notice and the Director grants the hearing, or the 26        Director determines not to grant the hearing and   SB0124- 5 -LRB104 06207 BAB 16242 b1        issues written findings in support of that decision; 2        or3            (C) the Director, on the Director's own motion, 4        determines to hold a hearing. If the proposed rate 5        adjustment exceeds 7% of the then-applicable rate for 6        personal lines insurance or 15% for commercial lines 7        insurance, then the Director must hold a hearing upon 8        a timely request. If the application is incomplete or 9        otherwise subject to disapproval, then the Director 10        may extend the application review process by up to 60 11        days with the agreement of the applicant.12    (h) Right of the public to inspect rates. All information 13provided to the Director pursuant to this Section shall be 14available for public inspection. 15    (i) Right of the public to participate. 16        (1) Any person may initiate or intervene in any 17    proceeding permitted or established pursuant to this 18    Section and challenge any action of the Director under 19    this Section.20        (2) The Director or a court shall award reasonable 21    advocacy and witness fees and expenses to any person who 22    demonstrates that the person represents the interests of 23    consumers and that the person made a substantial 24    contribution to the adoption of any order, regulation, or 25    decision by the Director or a court. Where such advocacy 26    occurs in response to a rate application, the award shall   SB0124- 6 -LRB104 06207 BAB 16242 b1    be paid by the applicant.2    (h) Rules. 3        (1) The Department shall, no later than 90 days after 4    the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 5    General Assembly, adopt rules that guide the filing and 6    approval of rates, rules, and forms pursuant to this 7    Section. The Director shall develop formulas for 8    evaluating rates and any rules or forms that impact rates 9    that will be used to determine whether to approve or 10    disapprove any filing.11        (2) Until the rules described in paragraph (1) take 12    effect, no insurer may file for a change in any rate, rule, 13    or form that would result in a rate increase. If, before 14    the adoption of the rules described in paragraph (1), an 15    insurer asserts that it would not be able to earn a 16    reasonable rate of return without an increase, then it may 17    request a hearing. If it is determined after a hearing 18    that a rate increase is needed to earn a reasonable rate of 19    return, then the insurer shall be allowed to make a change 20    that affords it the minimum increase required to earn a 21    reasonable rate of return. 22        (3) The Department shall, no later than 180 days after 23    the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 24    General Assembly, adopt rules that implement the testing 25    of insurer business practices for compliance with this 26    Section.   SB0124- 7 -LRB104 06207 BAB 16242 b1    (j) Fees. All insurers subject to the provisions of this 2Section shall be assessed a fee of 0.05% of their total earned 3premium from the prior calendar year. The fee shall be payable 4to the Department no later than July 1 of each calendar year 5and shall be used by the Department to implement the 6provisions of this Section.